incubator/apertium-krc/tests/harmony.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] Harmony stuff":
    август<n><loc><attr> : августдагъы
    ёт<v><iv><gpr_past> : ётген
    ансамбль<n><pl><acc> : ансамбллени
    спектакль<n><loc> : спектаклде

 "[twol] More harmony":
    де<v><tv><prc_perf> : деб
    эки<num><ord> : экинчи
    джокъ<adj>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : джокъду
    къура<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : къуралгъанды
    башла<vaux><prc_perf> : башлаб

 "[twol] with ю":
    союз<n><acc> : союзну
    союз<n><loc> : союзда
    самолёт<n><px3sp><nom> : самолёту
    июль<n><loc> : июлда
    къую<n><loc> : къуюда
    оюн<n><loc> : оюнда
    чоюн<n><loc> : чоюнда
    июнь<n><px3sp><loc> : июнунда
    июль<n><px3sp><loc> : июлунда

 "[twol] with consonantal у":
    серме<v><tv><coop><ger><nom> : сермешиу
    серме<v><tv><coop><ger><dat> : сермешиуге
    кёзюу<n><loc> : кёзюуде
    юс<n><px3sp><abl> : юсюнден

 "[twol] stuff":
    кюн<n><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : кюнюдю
    кёбю<prn><qnt><px3sp><dat> : кёбюсюне
    тюб<n><px3sp><nom> : тюбю
    кёбю<prn><qnt><px3sp><nom> : кёбюсю
    башлан<v><iv><ger><px3sp><nom> : башланыуу
    башлан<v><iv><ger><px3sp><dat> : башланыууна
    бёлюм<n><px3sp><nom> : бёлюмю
